dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
SFX a Y 31
SFX a o a o
SFX a o e o
SFX a o i o
SFX a o ala o
SFX a o ane o
SFX a 0 ci o
SFX a 0 gli o
SFX a 0 gliela o
SFX a 0 gliele o
SFX a 0 glieli o
SFX a 0 glielo o
SFX a 0 gliene o
SFX a 0 cela o
SFX a 0 cele o
SFX a 0 celi o
SFX a 0 celo o
SFX a 0 cene o
SFX a 0 sela o
SFX a 0 sele o
SFX a 0 seli o
SFX a 0 selo o
SFX a 0 sene o
SFX a 0 la o
SFX a 0 le o
SFX a 0 li o
SFX a 0 lo o
SFX a 0 mi o
SFX a 0 ne o
SFX a 0 si o
SFX a 0 ti o
SFX a 0 vi o

SFX b Y 30
SFX b 0 ci [eio]
SFX b 0 la [eio]
SFX b 0 le [eio]
SFX b 0 li [eio]
SFX b 0 lo [eio]
SFX b 0 ne [eio]
SFX b 0 cela [eio]
SFX b 0 cele [eio]
SFX b 0 celo [eio]
SFX b 0 celi [eio]
SFX b 0 cene [eio]
SFX b 0 glielo [eio]
SFX b 0 gliela [eio]
SFX b 0 glieli [eio]
SFX b 0 gliene [eio]
SFX b 0 gliele [eio]
SFX b 0 mela [eio]
SFX b 0 mele [eio]
SFX b 0 melo [eio]
SFX b 0 meli [eio]
SFX b 0 mene [eio]
SFX b 0 mi [ei]
SFX b 0 gli [ei]
SFX b 0 vi [ei]
SFX b 0 ti [io]
SFX b 0 vela [eo]
SFX b 0 vele [eo]
SFX b 0 velo [eo]
SFX b 0 veli [eo]
SFX b 0 vene [eo]

SFX c N 10
SFX c i elo immi
SFX c i ela immi
SFX c i ele immi
SFX c i eli immi
SFX c i ene immi
SFX c 0 elo igli
SFX c 0 ela igli
SFX c 0 ele igli
SFX c 0 eli igli
SFX c 0 ene igli

PFX d Y 1
PFX d 0 stra .

PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 pre .

SFX g N 4
SFX g o a o
SFX g o e o
SFX g o i o
SFX g lo ne lo

SFX h Y 40
SFX h si cela irsi
SFX h si cele irsi
SFX h si celi irsi
SFX h si celo irsi
SFX h si cene irsi
SFX h si ci irsi
SFX h si gli irsi
SFX h si gliela irsi
SFX h si gliele irsi
SFX h si glieli irsi
SFX h si glielo irsi
SFX h si gliene irsi
SFX h si la irsi
SFX h si le irsi
SFX h si li irsi
SFX h si lo irsi
SFX h si mela irsi
SFX h si mele irsi
SFX h si meli irsi
SFX h si melo irsi
SFX h si mene irsi
SFX h si mi irsi
SFX h si ne irsi
SFX h i ela irsi
SFX h i ele irsi
SFX h i eli irsi
SFX h i elo irsi
SFX h i ene irsi
SFX h si tela irsi
SFX h si tele irsi
SFX h si teli irsi
SFX h si telo irsi
SFX h si tene irsi
SFX h si ti irsi
SFX h si vela irsi
SFX h si vele irsi
SFX h si veli irsi
SFX h si velo irsi
SFX h si vene irsi
SFX h si vi irsi

PFX i Y 14
PFX i 0 l' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX i a l'A a
PFX i e l'E e
PFX i i l'I i
PFX i o l'O o
PFX i u l'U u
PFX i h l'H h
PFX i 0 L' [AEIOUH]
PFX i a L'A a
PFX i e L'E e
PFX i i L'I i
PFX i o L'O o
PFX i u L'U u
PFX i h L'H h

SFX m Y 34
SFX m 0 ci o
SFX m 0 gli o
SFX m 0 ti o
SFX m 0 si o
SFX m 0 vi o
SFX m o a o
SFX m o e o
SFX m o i o
SFX m 0 la o
SFX m 0 le o
SFX m 0 li o
SFX m 0 lo o
SFX m 0 ne o
SFX m 0 cela o
SFX m 0 cele o
SFX m 0 celo o
SFX m 0 celi o
SFX m 0 cene o
SFX m 0 glielo o
SFX m 0 gliela o
SFX m 0 glieli o
SFX m 0 gliene o
SFX m 0 gliele o
SFX m 0 mela o
SFX m 0 mele o
SFX m 0 melo o
SFX m 0 meli o
SFX m 0 mene o
SFX m 0 vela o
SFX m 0 vele o
SFX m 0 velo o
SFX m 0 veli o
SFX m 0 vene o
SFX m 0 mi o

SFX n N 2
SFX n ia e [cg]ia
SFX n o i io

SFX o Y 6
SFX o o i [^igc]o
SFX o o hi [gc]o
SFX o o 0 io
SFX o o a o
SFX o o e [^gc]o
SFX o o he [gc]o

SFX p Y 3
SFX p o i o
SFX p o a o
SFX p o he o

PFX q Y 15
PFX q 0 bell' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX q a bell'A a
PFX q e bell'E e
PFX q i bell'I i
PFX q o bell'O o
PFX q u bell'U u
PFX q h bell'H h
PFX q 0 Bell' [AEIOUH]
PFX q a Bell'A a
PFX q e Bell'E e
PFX q i Bell'I i
PFX q o Bell'O o
PFX q u Bell'U u
PFX q h Bell'H h
PFX q 0 BELL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]

PFX r Y 15
PFX r 0 brav' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX r a brav'A a
PFX r e brav'E e
PFX r i brav'I i
PFX r o brav'O o
PFX r u brav'U u
PFX r h brav'H h
PFX r 0 Brav' [AEIOUH]
PFX r a Brav'A a
PFX r e Brav'E e
PFX r i Brav'I i
PFX r o Brav'O o
PFX r u Brav'U u
PFX r h Brav'H h
PFX r 0 BRAV' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]

PFX s Y 15
PFX s 0 buon' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX s a buon'A a
PFX s e buon'E e
PFX s i buon'I i
PFX s o buon'O o
PFX s u buon'U u
PFX s h buon'H h
PFX s 0 Buon' [AEIOUH]
PFX s a Buon'A a
PFX s e Buon'E e
PFX s i Buon'I i
PFX s o Buon'O o
PFX s u Buon'U u
PFX s h Buon'H h
PFX s 0 BUON' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]

SFX t Y 176 # verbi in -isco della 3a coniugazione
SFX t e 0 ire
SFX t re sco ire
SFX t re sci ire
SFX t re sce ire
SFX t re scono ire
SFX t re amo ire
SFX t re scano ire
SFX t re vo ire
SFX t re vi ire
SFX t re va ire
SFX t re vamo ire
SFX t re vate ire
SFX t re vano ire
SFX t re i ire
SFX t re sti ire
SFX t ire ì ire
SFX t re mmo ire
SFX t re ste ire
SFX t e ono ire
SFX t e ò ire
SFX t e ai ire
SFX t e à ire
SFX t 0 mo ire
SFX t 0 te ire
SFX t e anno ire
SFX t re sca ire
SFX t re ate ire
SFX t re ssi ire
SFX t re sse ire
SFX t re ssimo ire
SFX t re ssero ire
SFX t 0 i ire
SFX t 0 sti ire
SFX t 0 bbe ire
SFX t 0 mmo ire
SFX t 0 ste ire
SFX t 0 bbero ire
SFX t ire ente ire
SFX t ire enti ire
SFX t ire entisi ire
SFX t ire entesi ire
SFX t re vasi ire
SFX t e mici ire
SFX t e misi ire
SFX t e tici ire
SFX t e tisi ire
SFX t e cisi ire
SFX t e glisi ire
SFX t e vici ire
SFX t e visi ire
SFX t e lesi ire
SFX t re scimi ire
SFX t re sciti ire
SFX t re scigli ire
SFX t re scine ire
SFX t re scici ire
SFX t re scila ire
SFX t re scile ire
SFX t re scilo ire
SFX t re scili ire
SFX t re scimela ire
SFX t re scimele ire
SFX t re scimelo ire
SFX t re scimeli ire
SFX t re scimene ire
SFX t re scitela ire
SFX t re scitele ire
SFX t re scitelo ire
SFX t re sciteli ire
SFX t re scitene ire
SFX t re sciglieli ire
SFX t re scigliele ire
SFX t re sciglielo ire
SFX t re scigliela ire
SFX t re scigliene ire
SFX t re scicela ire
SFX t re scicele ire
SFX t re scicelo ire
SFX t re sciceli ire
SFX t re scicene ire
SFX t re amola ire
SFX t re amole ire
SFX t re amolo ire
SFX t re amoli ire
SFX t re amone ire
SFX t re amocelo ire
SFX t re amoceli ire
SFX t re amocela ire
SFX t re amocele ire
SFX t re amocene ire
SFX t re amogliela ire
SFX t re amogliele ire
SFX t re amoglielo ire
SFX t re amoglieli ire
SFX t re amogliene ire
SFX t re amovelo ire
SFX t re amoveli ire
SFX t re amovela ire
SFX t re amovele ire
SFX t re amovene ire
SFX t re amoci ire
SFX t re amovi ire
SFX t re amogli ire
SFX t re temelo ire
SFX t re temela ire
SFX t re temele ire
SFX t re temeli ire
SFX t re temene ire
SFX t re teglielo ire
SFX t re tegliela ire
SFX t re tegliele ire
SFX t re teglieli ire
SFX t re tegliene ire
SFX t re teselo ire
SFX t re tesela ire
SFX t re tesele ire
SFX t re teseli ire
SFX t re tesene ire
SFX t re tecela ire
SFX t re tecele ire
SFX t re tecelo ire
SFX t re teceli ire
SFX t re tecene ire
SFX t re tevelo ire
SFX t re tevela ire
SFX t re tevele ire
SFX t re teveli ire
SFX t re to ire
SFX t re te ire
SFX t re ti ire
SFX t re ta ire
SFX t re tolo ire
SFX t re tola ire
SFX t re tole ire
SFX t re tissimo ire
SFX t re tissima ire
SFX t re tissime ire
SFX t re tissimi ire
SFX t re tomi ire
SFX t re toti ire
SFX t re tosi ire
SFX t re toci ire
SFX t re tovi ire
SFX t re toli ire
SFX t re tone ire
SFX t re togli ire
SFX t re temi ire
SFX t re tesi ire
SFX t re teci ire
SFX t re tevi ire
SFX t re tegli ire
SFX t re tene ire
SFX t re tami ire
SFX t re tati ire
SFX t re tasi ire
SFX t re taci ire
SFX t re tavi ire
SFX t re tagli ire
SFX t re tane ire
SFX t re tala ire
SFX t re tili ire
SFX t re tine ire
SFX t re tevene ire
SFX t re tavene ire
SFX t re tivene ire
SFX t re tovene ire
SFX t re telo ire
SFX t re tela ire
SFX t re tele ire
SFX t re teli ire
SFX t re amoti ire
SFX t re amomelo ire
SFX t re amomela ire
SFX t re amomele ire
SFX t re amomeli ire
SFX t re amomene ire

SFX u Y 2 # sostantivi/aggettivi in -e con femminile in -a, plurale maschile in -i e plurale femminile in -e
SFX u e a e # femminile
SFX u e i e # plurale maschile
