dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
accattona/QRTUqrs
accinsero/Tqr
acclamazione/STUqrs
acidimetria/QTUqrs
adempiersi/LTqr
adolescenza/QTUqrs
aerazione/STUqrs
agghindato/FTUqrs
aggiungente/Us
aggrinziscono/Tqr
alina/QTUq
allineare/ATXqr
alveolare/STUqrs
amicrobica/QRTUqrs
ammonirti/Tqr
andrebbe/Tqr
anitra/QTUqrs
annali/Tqr
annichilire/tTX
antifona/QTUqrs
aortica/QRTUqrs
appenare/ATXqr
appiccicante/Us
aquilifero/OTqr
arancia/nTUqrs
arcidiaconato/OTqr
arrabbiato/FTUYqrs
arrivedella/QTUqrs
arruffapopolo/OTqr
assegnataria/QTUqrs
asseverare/ATXqr
astrodinamica/QTUqrs
atteggiamento/OTqr
attergare/ATXqr
autogeno/OTqr
autoricrea/TUqrs
avvitatore/STq
avvoltoio/OTqr
barbaccia/n
beghino/o
benedetto/YWedJa
benedice/edJ
benediceste/edJ
benediceva/edJ
benediciamo/bedJ
benedici/edJb
benedico/edJ
benediranno/edJ
benedirebbero/edJ
benediresti/edJ
benedirò/edJ
benedirsi/edJh
benedite/bedJ
benedivamo/edJ
bettolaccia/n
bevete/b
biomeccanico/p
bisognoso/o
boccaccia/n
bontempone/u
bragia/nQ
bulbillifero/o
buontempone/u
caloscia/n
camitico/p
carbonaro/o
carrareccia/n
cengia/n
ceroso/o
chiesastico/p
colletto/o
colorire/t
commesso/aJ
compianto/m
componi/b
concordatario/oe
conduci/bJ
conformistico/p
connesso/mJ
conscia/n
consunto/o
contorciamo/b
contraddetto/YWedJa
contraddica/edJ
contraddicessi/edJ
contraddicesti/edJ
contraddiciate/edJ
contraddici/edJb
contraddiranno/edJ
contraddir/edJ
contraddirò/edJ
contraddirsi/edJh
contraete/b
contrapponete/b
contundete/b
coperto/mJY
correndo/Ee
crinito/o
crocifiggiamo/b
decomposto/m
defluire/t
dermico/p
detto/eJa
diccelo/g
diceste/eJ
diciamo/bedJ
diciate/edJ
difeso/m
digli/c
diminuire/t
dimmelo/g
dirà/edJ
dirsi/eJh
dirugginio/n
disciolto/mJ
disdetto/YWedJa
disdica/edJ
disdicano/edJ
disdiceste/edJ
disdiciamo/bedJ
disdiciate/edJ
disdici/edJb
disdirebbero/edJ
disdirò/edJ
disdirsi/edJh
disporlo/g
dissepolto/m
distraete/b
distruttivo/o
disubbidito/a
dite/beJ
divelto/m
documentaristico/p
elettrica/QRTUqrs
elettroforo/OTqr
enclitica/QRTUqrs
erculea/QTUqrs
erronea/QTUqrs
esocrino/OTqr
eterica/QRTUqrs
farcire/t
femminuccia/n
filomonarchico/p
fio/n
forticcia/n
frammisto/o
freatico/p
geroglifico/p
godereccia/n
granchiesco/o
guardacaccia/n
guarire/t
iafetidi/Tqr
identitaria/QTUqrs
illuminato/FTUqrs
imborghesire/tTXqr
impallidire/tTXqr
impavido/OTYqr
imperadore/STUqrs
implicazione/STUqrs
impreziosire/tTXqr
incenerire/tXT
inchinato/FTUqrs
incollato/FTUqrs
incomposta/QTUqrs
indetto/YWedaXi
indica/edXi
indicano/edXi
indicemmo/edXi
indicessero/edXi
indicessimo/edXi
indiceste/edXi
indicesti/edXi
indicevamo/edXi
indicevate/edXi
indicevo/edXi
indiciamo/bedXi
indiciate/edXi
indico/edXi
indirà/edXi
indiranno/edXi
indirebbe/edXi
indirei/edXi
indiresti/edXi
indissero/edXi
indissi/edXi
induciamo/b
infanatichire/tTX
infialettatrice/STUqrs
infrigidire/tTXqr
ingessato/FTUqrs
ingrigire/t
iniziativa/QTUqrs
insignificabile/STUqrs
inspessire/tTqr
interdetto/YWedaXi
interdica/edXi
interdicesse/edXi
interdicesti/edXi
interdicevamo/edXi
interdicevate/edXi
interdiciate/edXi
interdì/edXi
interdirebbe/edXi
interdir/edXi
interdiremmo/edXi
interdiresti/edXi
interdirete/edXi
interdirsi/edhXT
interdissi/edXi
interpolabilità/TUqrs
intracellulare/STUqrs
intrattenere/BTXqr
intuire/tTXqr
ipoglossa/QTUqrs
ipoplastica/QRTUqrs
irrugginire/tTXqr
isatico/Tqr
laringoscopico/p
leggete/b
letto/mJ
levataccia/n
locativo/o
macrosomico/p
maledetto/YWedJa
maledica/edJ
maledicessimo/edJ
malediciamo/bedJ
maledici/edJb
maledirai/edJ
maledireste/edJ
maledirsi/edJh
maledissi/edJ
mammuccia/n
mellito/o
mercurico/p
meticcia/n
micelico/p
monocarbossilico/p
naturalistico/pY
nazareno/o
neuroplegico/p
obliterante/Us
ochetta/QTUqrs
ombudsman/Tqr
onomastica/QRTUqrs
orbitato/FTUqrs
ordinare/ATXeqr
ossame/STUqrs
ostentatoria/QTUqrs
paraguaiano/o
parapioggia/n
paretimologico/p
partorire/t
percosso/mJ
picconiere/u
pisano/o
podalico/p
portamiccia/n
prediccelo/g
predigli/c
predisporlo/g
preteso/m
probativo/o
producete/bJ
prometeico/p
protetto/mW
punire/t
ravvolto/m
razzistico/pY
reggia/nQ
reintrodurlo/o
reperire/t
retto/mYW
riavvolto/m
ricomprendi/b
ridiccelo/g
ridigli/c
ridimmelo/g
rimbruttire/t
rimpianto/m
ringentilire/t
rischiarire/t
rotto/m
saldissimo/o
sappi/b
scheletrire/t
sconfitto/m
scoreggia/n
scuci/b
semiaperto/m
semitico/p
sepolto/m
serotino/o
sgranchire/t
smungiamo/b
soggiunto/m
sorretto/m
speculatorio/o
spettrometrico/p
stravolto/m
tabellino/o
teleautografico/p
terraccia/n
tieni/b
traete/b
transgenico/p
trascesolo/o
tumefatto/m
ubriaca/QTUqrs
uretrale/STUqrs
usto/OTqr
vescia/n
vetusto/oYW
